Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
ARTICLE 2
DRIVERS' LICENSES

Cross references:

For disposition of fines and penalties under parts 1, 2, and 4 of this article, see § 42-1-217.

Section

PART 1 DRIVERS' LICENSES

PART 2 HABITUAL OFFENDERS

PART 3 IDENTIFICATION CARDS

PART 4 COMMERCIAL DRIVERS' LICENSES

PART 5 COLORADO ROAD AND COMMUNITY SAFETY ACT

PART 6 COMMERCIAL DRIVING SCHOOLS